Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Personal Service Contracts

45.700.
Definitions for KRS 45.705 to 45.720. [Repealed.]

45.705.
Copies of personal service contracts to be filed. [Repealed.]

45.710.
Copies to be filed with legislative research commission — Other documentation — File open to public inspection — Conditions for payment. [Repealed.]

45.712.
Personal service contracts exempt from review — Filing for informational purposes — Effect of amendments on exempt contracts. [Repealed.]

45.715.
Personal service contract review subcommittee — Objections or disapproval of contracts to be reviewed by secretary of finance and administration — Monthly report. [Repealed.]

45.716.
Personal service contract prohibited for advertising, promotional or public relations service — When — Review and determination by commissioner of arts. [Repealed.]

45.717.
Limitation on personal service contracts. [Repealed.]

45.718.
Identity of executioner to be confidential. [Repealed.]

45.720.
Duty of Legislative Research Commission. [Repealed.]